Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in and Contributions to the Fund

47-11-40.
Eligibility to participate; credit for service rendered; requirements for judges to participate.

Before any person shall be eligible to participate in the fund he or she must:

Be serving as secretary-treasurer or as an employee of the board; or

Be a duly qualified and commissioned judge of the probate court of a county of the State of Georgia. Any judge of a probate court or employee of the board who desires to participate in the fund shall further comply with applicable provisions in paragraphs (2) through (9) of this Code section;

In the case of judges of the probate courts or employees of the board, make application to the board for membership in the fund on a form to be furnished by the board for that purpose, giving such information, together with verification and proof thereof, as may be required by the board;

As to judges of the probate courts, make application to the board within a period of 12 months after commencing such service as a judge of the probate court in order to claim and receive credit for services rendered retroactive to the date of the commencement of such service or forever be barred from claiming or receiving any credit for any service rendered prior to the date the application is received in the office of the secretary-treasurer.

As to employees of the board, make application to the board within a period of 12 months after commencing such service as an employee of the board in order to claim and receive credit for services rendered retroactive to the date of the commencement of such service or forever be barred from claiming or receiving any credit for any service rendered prior to the date the application is received in the office of the secretary-treasurer; provided, however, that no employee of the board shall be credited with any service to the board which occurred prior to January 1, 1990; and provided, further, that any person serving as an employee of the board prior to July 1, 1992, shall have until July 1, 1993, to make application with the board and to receive credit for services rendered after January 1, 1990;

Any person who on July 1, 1994, has been eligible for membership in the fund for at least 12 months immediately preceding that date and who has never joined the fund may join or rejoin the fund by complying with all relevant provisions of this Code section; provided, however, that such person must make application to the board of commissioners not later than June 30, 1995, or forever be barred from receiving credit toward retirement for any time served prior to the date any application for membership is received in the office of the secretary-treasurer.

Any person who becomes a member pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be entitled to obtain service credit for any period during which such person was eligible for membership. Any person who is a member on July 1, 1994, and who has failed to obtain service credit for any period of service as a probate judge may receive service credit for such period for which service credit has not been awarded. Such service credit may be obtained not later than June 30, 1995, by complying with the provisions of paragraphs (5) and (6) of this Code section;

As to judges of the probate courts or employees of the board, file with such application a sworn statement setting out the length of time served as judge of the probate court by the applicant since December 22, 1953, or as an employee of the board since January 1, 1990, and such judge’s net earnings for each month during such entire period, which may be arrived at by deducting any and all sums spent for the operation of his or her office if he or she is on a fee basis, but by the gross amount if he or she is on salary; provided, however, that if by either method the income of such judge of the probate court or employee of the board for his or her service as such:

Exceeds $12,000.00 per annum or an average of more than $1,000.00 per month for any calendar year prior to 1979, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $12,000.00 during such year and shall be adjusted to this figure;

Exceeds $6,000.00 or an average of more than $1,000.00 per month for the six-month period beginning January 1, 1979, and ending June 30, 1979, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $6,000.00 during such six-month period and shall be adjusted to this figure;

Exceeds $7,500.00 or an average of more than $1,250.00 per month for the six-month period beginning July 1, 1979, and ending December 31, 1979, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $7,500.00 during such six-month period and shall be adjusted to this figure;

Exceeds $15,000.00 per annum or an average of more than $1,250.00 per month for any calendar year after 1979, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $15,000.00 during such year and shall be adjusted to this figure;

Exceeds $20,000.00 per annum or an average of more than $1,666.66 per month for any calendar year after 1990, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $20,000.00 during such year and shall be adjusted to this figure;

Exceeds $25,000.00 per annum or an average of more than $2,083.33 per month for any calendar year after 1992, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $25,000.00 during such year and shall be adjusted to this figure; or

Exceeds $30,000.00 per annum or an average of more than $2,500.00 per month for any calendar year after 1998, such income shall be deemed to be not more than $30,000.00 during such year and shall be adjusted to this figure; provided, however, that the board of commissioners is authorized to increase such amounts by not more than 3 percent each year, provided that such increase is based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

As to judges of the probate courts or employees of the board, remit to the board with his or her application the sum of $105.00 per month as dues, together with interest at a rate of 6 percent per annum from the end of the month in which such dues accrued;

As to judges of the probate courts or employees of the board, file with the board for each month subsequent to admission as a member by the close of business of the twentieth day of each month the sum certain of $105.00; provided, however, that the requirement for such dues shall cease after the member has paid such dues for a period of 30 years; and

As to judges of the probate courts or employees of the board, all applications for membership, sworn statements of net earnings, remittances of dues, and all other information, facts, or figures in connection with this Code section are subject to being examined, audited, and approved by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 7; Ga. L. 1959, p. 354, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 57, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 548, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 754, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 596, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1990, p. 543, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 342, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 166, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1278, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 66/SB 436; Ga. L. 2016, p. 354, § 1/HB 635.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” three times in this Code section.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “30 years” for “20 years” at the end of paragraph (7).

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-11-41.
Service credit not allowed for periods during which contributions not timely paid.

No member shall receive service credit for any month in which an arrearage exists in the payment of dues required by Code Section 47-11-40 or the portion of the collected revenues required to be paid to the fund by Article 4 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-11-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 342, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1278, § 2.

47-11-42.
Suspension of membership.

Any member who has been in arrears in the payment of dues required by Code Section 47-11-40 or the portion of the collected revenues required to be paid to the fund by Article 4 of this chapter for a period of 90 days shall be suspended from membership effective on the ninetieth day of such arrearage. Such member may apply for reinstatement as an active member only during the 30 day period beginning with his or her next full term of office, and such member shall not receive service credit for such period of suspension.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-11-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1278, § 3.

47-11-43.
Obtaining creditable service.

Any member who is active on July 1, 2016, may obtain creditable service for any service in excess of 20 years as judge of the probate court, employee of the board, or secretary-treasurer, but not more than the actual number of years of service or 30 years, whichever is less. Any such member shall make application in such form and manner as the board deems appropriate and shall pay to the board an amount determined by the board to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service as provided in this Code section. Any such application and payment must be received not later than December 31, 2016.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-11-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 354, § 2/HB 635.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.